Idaho, session 2026, H0898.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 8, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-818A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-818A. STATE HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM. (1) There shall be a
state historic preservation officer who shall be appointed by the governor,
serve at the pleasure of the governor, and be qualified by reason of educa-
tion, training, experience, and demonstrated ability to fill the position.
The compensation for the state historic preservation officer shall be set by
the governor.
(2) The state historic preservation officer may employ staff as nec-
essary for the purpose of administering a state historic preservation pro-
gram in accordance with the requirements set forth by the national historic
preservation act.
(3) The state historic preservation program shall be within the office
of species, minerals, and energy coordination. Such office is authorized to
and shall administer and enforce the provisions of this section and the na-
tional historic preservation act, not to exceed the standards required by
federal law.
(4) The state historic preservation officer shall appoint an adequate
and qualified state historic preservation review board in accordance with
the national historic preservation act.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-4112, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4112. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the board of trustees of the Idaho state historical
society.
(2) "Historical record" means any record, artifact, object, historical
or archaeological site or structure, document, evidence or public or private
writing pursuant to the provisions of title 9, Idaho Code, relevant to the
history of the state of Idaho.


(3) "Idaho state historical society" and "society" mean the educa-
tional institution pursuant to chapter 41, title 67, Idaho Code. The society
includes the Idaho state museum, the Idaho state archives and state records
center, the state historic preservation office, and operates in public trust
state historic sites, including the old Idaho penitentiary, John and Ann
Doney house, the Lorenzo Hill Hatch house, Franklin relic hall, Franklin co-
operative mercantile institution, Rock Creek station and Stricker homesite,
and Pierce courthouse.
SECTION 3. That Section 67-4127, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4127. DIRECTOR OF THE SOCIETY APPOINTED BY BOARD -- POWERS AND DU-
TIES. A director of the society shall be appointed by the board of trustees,
serve at the pleasure of the board, be qualified by reason of his education,
training, experience and demonstrated ability to fill such position, and ex-
ercise the following powers and duties in addition to all other powers and
duties inherent in the position or delegated to him or imposed upon him by the
board:
1. To be a nonvoting member of the board of trustees and secretary
thereto.
2. To be the administrative officer of the state historical society.
3. To prescribe such rules as may be necessary for the efficient opera-
tion of his office.
4. To serve as state historic preservation officer if so appointed by
the governor pursuant to section 67-4127A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-4127A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.